






















 
neufund.org August 2017 

http://neufund.org/


 

 

 

Whitepaper​ V. 2.0   

neufund.org September 2017 2 

http://neufund.org/


 

 

1 What is Neufund? 6 

2 Vision 7 

3 Ecosystem Impact 9 

4 Definitions 11 

5 Neufund Token Economy 14 

5.1 Investment Transaction 16 

5.2 Neumark Token Value 17 

5.3 Neumark Issuance Model 19 

5.4 Neumark Distribution 21 

5.5 Example Fee & Token Distribution 22 

6 Neufund Initial Capital Building Mechanism 23 

6.1 Ether & EURO Token ICBM Phases 26 

6.2 Neumark Trading on Secondary Market 27 

6.3 Important ICBM Terms 27 

7 Investment Platform Description 29 

7.1 Fundraising with Stable Coin (EURT) & Ether 29 

7.1.1 EURT Lifecycle 30 

7.2 Equity Tokens 31 

7.2.1 Equity Token Value 31 

7.2.2 On-chain Governance 32 

7.3 Protocol Tokens 33 

7.4 Investment Terms & Investment Agreement 33 

7.5 Equity Token Offerings 34 

7.6 Fees & Proceeds Distribution 35 

7.7 Internal Token Converter 35 

7.8 Investor Perspective 36 

7.8.1 Investor Qualification & KYC Requirements 36 

neufund.org September 2017 3 

http://neufund.org/


 

7.8.2 Professional Investor Features 36 

7.9 Company Perspective 37 

7.9.1 Company Registration & Legal Due Diligence 37 

7.9.2 Company Cap Table 37 

7.9.3 The Fundraising Process described 37 

7.10 Platform Security 39 

7.10.1 Two Factor Authentication 39 

7.10.2 Authentication using web3 40 

7.10.3 Authentication using Neukey 40 

7.10.4 Account Protection using Watched Wallet 40 

7.11 Developer’s Perspective - Neufund Investment Protocol 41 

7.11.1 Extensible Fund Governance 41 

7.11.2 Tokenized Fund 42 

7.11.3 Custom Company Governance 42 

7.11.4 Alternative ETO Pricing Mechanisms 42 

7.11.5 Custom Tokens & Token Offerings 43 

8 Neufund Organisational Structure & Legal Considerations 44 

8.1 Neufund’s Approach to Legal Issues 44 

8.2 Platform Governance & Organisational Structure 45 

8.2.1 Fifth Force 45 

8.2.2 Neumark Holders 46 

8.2.3 Company Investors 46 

8.2.4 Companies 46 

8.2.5 Neumint 47 

8.2.6 Transparent Trustee 47 

8.3 Regulatory Considerations 48 

8.3.1 No “Neufund ICO” 48 

8.3.2 Neumarks 48 

neufund.org September 2017 4 

http://neufund.org/


 

8.3.3 Equity Token Offerings of Companies 49 

8.3.4 Equity Tokens 49 

9 Roadmap 50 

9.1 Build Primary Market for Equity Token 50 

9.2 Fifth Force (Platform Operator) Redundancy 52 

10 Reporting & Communication 53 

11 Team & Advisors 54 

11.1 Team 54 

11.2 Advisors 55 
 

   

neufund.org September 2017 5 

http://neufund.org/


 

1 What is Neufund? 
Neufund is a community-owned fundraising platform. It acts as a bridge between the                         

investment world and the blockchain space. Using our legal and technical infrastructure,                       

startups and established companies alike can legally issue a new type of asset we call                             

tokenized equity. We achieve this by formally linking traditional contracts with Ethereum                       

smart contracts through mutual reference and code correspondence. 

Once these shares are created, anyone can invest into the company issuing them and                           

verify the company’s claims by checking smart contracts and transaction data on the                         

public ledger. The result is a primary market for real world, technologically enhanced                         

equivalents to shares – “equity tokens” – that aim to be as liquid as cryptocurrency. By                               

joining the platform and bringing their fiat currency on-chain, users gain access to this                           

market. In this way, Neufund also functions as a powerful mechanism for onboarding                         

off-chain investors and companies to the crypto economy. 

Companies can thus raise funds from investors in their existing network, as well as any                             

cryptocurrency holder, or via the capital pool on the Neufund platform dedicated for                         

funding. Once a company has successfully completed a campaign and issued their equity                         

tokens, Neufund provides an easy-to-use user interface for interacting with shareholders.                     

It is possible to hold votes for legally binding resolutions, issue updates and reports,                           

open further fundraising rounds, enable secondary trading of equity tokens, and perform                       

other functions necessary for responsible corporate governance.  

In order for the described components to work and the system to sustain itself, Neufund                             

is designed to be a true token economy. Its value is reflected by a protocol token called                                 

Neumark, which participants earn by committing capital to the platform. This essentially                       

allows people to economically own the ecosystem, a powerful incentive for investors to                         

bootstrap the platform and grow it with further investment. Neumarks are an attractive                         

asset: they entitle their holders to revenues from platform fees for ETOs (Equity Token                           

Offerings) taking place on Neufund, as well as economic benefit from a platform portfolio                           

pool holding a small amount of every ETO ever conducted (more in ​chapter 4 ​).  

neufund.org September 2017 6 

http://neufund.org/


 

2 Vision 
Our vision for Neufund is to ​open innovation for good​. Our goal is to provide creators                               
with the tools to fund their ventures by going directly to those who believe in their                               

success. That is why we have chosen the name of ​Neufund​: it is ​the new way to fund                                   
ventures ​. In building it, we seek to remove unnecessary barriers, including geographical                       
and jurisdictional constraints, that prevent the alliance of inventors and investors from                       

forming. While our networks have grown global and turned digital, our assets remain                         

highly immobile. Investing capital through traditional channels still is unnecessarily                   

difficult and expensive, requiring voluminous paperwork, long waits, high broker fees,                     

and a dependence on a variety of counterparties or intermediaries. 

As a result of these limitations, the investment ecosystem and financial industry at large                           

rely on governmental intervention to curb the worst excesses of the system. Regulations                         

are designed to protect investors; however, with the vast scope and subtleties of these                           

financial regulations, novice investors find themselves entirely excluded from the most                     

attractive opportunities, thus depriving all of us of the impact that the entrepreneurs                         

supported by their capital might create. 

Therefore, our mission is the following: 

● reduce transaction costs between the two sides of the investment process 
● open the investment space for private equity to everyone 
● eliminate geographical constraints from venture creation 
● make real world private equity fully liquid by tokenizing it 
● onboard off-chain companies to the crypto economy 
● provide legally secure management functions for equity management 

We are tremendously excited by the potential for net positive disruption and innovation                         

that distributed ledger technology offers. But we are neither utopians, nor do we have                           

illusions as to the hard and unexciting work it takes to achieve it. This is why our strategy                                   

is designed to start off legally and technically secure, and then proceed to gradually                           

decentralize all functions of the platform. We aim to “tokenize the enterprise” , and melt                           1

1 "Tokenize the Enterprise – The BigchainDB Blog." 6 Jun. 2017,                     
https://blog.bigchaindb.com/tokenize-the-enterprise-23d51bafb536​. Accessed 4 Aug. 2017. 

neufund.org September 2017 7 

https://blog.bigchaindb.com/tokenize-the-enterprise-23d51bafb536
http://neufund.org/


 

all parts of the company into the community by distributing its ownership widely. To that                             

end, we have decided to pursue a plan with two parallel paths:: 

1. Build a primary market for equity tokens with four key components: sufficient                       

liquidity, a functioning investment platform, the Neumark token economy, and an                     

attractive portfolio of deals. 

2. Make Neufund redundant by transforming all legal entities into fully token-holder                     

owned “public” companies. 

As ​software eats the world , and as blockchain eats commerce , the era of monolithic                           2 3

companies controlling value flows is giving way to the era of fat protocols . Neufund fuels                             4

the transition from a traditional static, manual funding environment to a dynamic, more                         

fluid and open ecosystem for all participants. 

 

   

2 "How software is eating the world - Breaking Smart." ​https://breakingsmart.com/en/season-1/​. Accessed 4                         
Aug. 2017. 
3 "Blockchain: Powering the Internet of Value - EVRY."                 
https://www.evry.com/globalassets/insight/bank2020/bank-2020---blockchain-powering-the-internet-of-val
ue---whitepaper.pdf​. Accessed 4 Aug. 2017. 
4 "Fat Protocols | Union Square Ventures." 8 Aug. 2016, ​http://www.usv.com/blog/fat-protocols​. Accessed 4                         
Aug. 2017. 

neufund.org September 2017 8 

https://breakingsmart.com/en/season-1/
https://www.evry.com/globalassets/insight/bank2020/bank-2020---blockchain-powering-the-internet-of-value---whitepaper.pdf
https://www.evry.com/globalassets/insight/bank2020/bank-2020---blockchain-powering-the-internet-of-value---whitepaper.pdf
http://www.usv.com/blog/fat-protocols
http://neufund.org/


 

3 Ecosystem Impact 
A platform like Neufund does not simply exist in isolation. It exists as part of a live                                 

ecosystem, and itself impacts the broader investment space and crypto-community in a                       

number of ways. Yet, unlike other projects that use the technology for simple fundraising,                           

Neufund aims to strengthen and expand the blockchain ecosystem itself in a number of                           

ways ​. 

Neufund acts as a mechanism for onboarding off-chain organizations and businesses to                       

blockchain, and specifically Ethereum. There is a clear incentive for existing ventures to                         

“blockchainize” part of their operations, especially investor relations. We provide a tool                       

for existing businesses to dip their toe in the waters of blockchain by making the                             

tokenization of equity easy, legal, and secure. In that way, we are facilitating the creation                             

of many new and valuable token systems that do not need their own blockchain platform.                             

This makes the whole Ethereum ecosystem stronger by tieing more of its pieces to value                             

created in the off-chain world. 

Neufund also incentivizes investors from both crypto and non-crypto spaces to provide                       

capital for innovation. Investors already active in the crypto space gain access to                         

attractive investment opportunities from outside the space. Investors that have yet to join                         

the crypto economy find in Neufund an easy way to get started. With our stable coin                               

“EURT” (Euro Token, pegged 1:1 to Euro) we bring off-chain capital on chain. This                           

provides a stable reference for value of investments and may stabilize the price of Ether                             

by preventing sell-offs (learn more about the Euro Token in ​chapter 7.1​). 

Neufund makes it easy for regular people to participate in the crypto space. It features a                               

full UX easily approachable by the average internet user as well as tutorials to slowly                             

build up basic knowledge of crypto technology and economics. In this way we provide a                             

full suite of tools for individuals to fuel a process of gradual learning and commitment,                             

and demystify blockchain. 

In addition, Neufund’s call for committing funds – or ICBM, for Initial Capital Building                           

Mechanism – to the platform differs substantially from regular ICOs both in mechanism                         

and impact. As is explained in detail in ​chapter 5​, contrary to widespread practice we do                               
not simply collect funds to sell off over time. Instead we ask investors to commit their                               

funds to use on the platform; but funds remain fully under the control of users. The                               

neufund.org September 2017 9 

http://neufund.org/


 

Neumark token we generate and distribute to investors is merely a reward for doing so.                             

In that way we are ​bootstrapping a two-sided marketplace and investment ecosystem ​.                       
We hope that, if successful, this model becomes an attractive option for other projects                           

(especially marketplaces) to consider. 

Lastly, we work towards greater transparency and accountability for fundraising via ICOs.                       

Currently, investors in the crypto space face a problem: how can they make sure that                             

project owners issuing tokens actually follow through on the promises they make? As it                           

stands today, the transactions between investors and project owners in far too many                         

cases take place without any legally binding contracts. As such, they have no means of                             

protecting themselves against fraud, misuse of funds, and other questionable conduct.                     

The only thing holding project owners accountable is the potential for loss of reputation                           

and goodwill. This goes against the founding ethos of trustless systems entirely. 

From the very beginning, the emphasis has been on building systems of cooperation that                           

use economic incentives to align the interests of disparate groups of people, and rely on                             

sophisticated technical infrastructure to secure their interactions. What has been missing,                     

however, is a common sense integration with existing legal systems to provide the                         

enforcement mechanisms necessary for keeping parties accountable. This finally enables                   

long term planning. By making ICOs a simple repeatable process with legal security                         

built-in, investors across the crypto space gain leverage to demand better contractual                       

agreements from founders by pointing to the low cost and great ease of conducting an                             

ICO on the Neufund platform. 

 

   

neufund.org September 2017 10 

http://neufund.org/


 

4 Definitions 
 

Actors 

Investors 
Investors are both individuals and organisations that want to invest on the ​Platform by                           
acquiring ​Equity Tokens ​. They are rewarded with ​Neumarks​. 

For more go to ​Investor perspective ​. 

 

Companies 
Companies are off-chain entities that raise capital on the ​Platform by issuing ​Equity                         
Tokens ​ to ​Investors ​. 

For more go to ​Company Perspective​. 

 

Platform 
Platform is the main tool in the Neufund ecosystem. It connects ​Investors with                         
Companies​, allowing the former to invest in ​Equity Tokens issued by the latter. Revenue                           
from this activity is distributed to ​Neumark holders (through the ​Neumark Reward                       
mechanism). Platform is operated by Fifth Force GmbH with the help of supporting                         

entities. Platform will become community owned upon the ​Equity Token Offering of Fifth                         
Force GmbH. 

For more go to ​Investment Platform​ and ​Organisational Structure​. 

 

Tokens 

Neumarks (NEU) 
Investors ​get Neumarks as a reward for investing on the ​Platform ​. Neumark represents a                           
share of the ecosystem. More specifically, it gives its holder a right to Platform ​fees and                               

neufund.org September 2017 11 

http://neufund.org/


 

participation in the Platform portfolio. Neumarks can be transferred among users, but can                         

circulate outside the user base of people registered on the ​Platform​.  

For more go to ​Neufund Token Economy​. 

 

Equity Tokens 

Equity Tokens represent, and have legal ties to, equity (shares) in ​Companies ​. Each                         
Company issues its own Equity Tokens during its own ​Equity Token Offering ​. Equity                         
Tokens are acquired by ​Investors ​. 

For more go to ​Equity Tokens​. 

 

Ether (ETH) 
Native token of the Ethereum blockchain. It can be used for the purpose of conducting                             

Commitment Transactions ​or ​Investment Transactions ​. 

 

Euro Token (EURT) 
Euro Token is an on-chain representation of Euro within the ​Platform ​. EURT cannot live                           
or be used outside the Platform. 

For more go to ​EURT Lifecycle ​ and ​Neumint ​. 

 

Market Mechanisms 

Initial Capital Building Mechanism (ICBM) - Neufund Platform “ICO” 

ICBM is a capital building event, consisting of ​Commitment Transactions​. It is ​not a                           
token pre-sale. All funds gathered during the ICBM still belong to ​Investors who make                           
individual decisions which ​Equity Token Offering ​ to fund at a later date. 

For more go to ​ICBM ​. 

neufund.org September 2017 12 

http://neufund.org/


 

 

Investment Transaction 

Investment of ​Ether or ​Euro Token into a ​Company in its ​Equity Token Offering ​,                           
rewarded by ​Equity Tokens ​. 

For more go to ​Investment Terms ​. 

 

Commitment Transaction 

Commitment of funds ( ​Ether or ​Euro Token ​) by ​Investors ​during the ​ICBM to the                           
Platform ​ for later investment, rewarded by the ​Neumark Reward ​. 

For more go to ​ICBM ​. 

 

Equity Token Offering (ETO) 

During a ​Company’s ​ETO, ​Investors may acquire ​Equity Tokens​. ETOs will be organized                         
on the ​Platform ​. 

For more go to ​Equity Tokens​. 

 

Neumark Reward  

Investors ​ get ​Neumarks ​ as a reward for committing their funds to use on the platform 
during the ​ICBM, ​and by investing into ​Companies ​ on the ​Platform​ once launched. The 
sooner the Investor commits funds, the higher the Neumark Reward received. The same 
applies to funds invested on the Platform, after the initial ​commitment ​ phase is over. 

For more go to ​Neufund Token Economy​. 

 

neufund.org September 2017 13 

http://neufund.org/


 

5 Neufund Token Economy 
Neufund is a community owned fundraising platform. To make it a functioning                       

blockchain economy we introduce a platform token called Neumark, along with several                       

mechanisms that determine the nature of transactions between platform participants and                     

thus Neumark value. The two main types of actors on the platforms are ​investors and                             
companies ​. Investors bring capital to the platform and look for interesting investment                       
opportunities in companies. Companies are businesses of various kinds that look for                       

funding by offering part of their shares to investors. The fundamental transaction of our                           

platform is ​investment​, where investors become shareholders in companies via Equity                     
Token Offerings (ETO ). The Neufund platform’s value grows when number and volume                       5

of investments grows, so its economy must be designed to stimulate investment and                         

reward transacting participants. 

Since we are creating a blockchain economy, it is useful to note that blockchain is                             

not only a technology but also a new way for people to interact, including economic                             

relations. The principles governing a proper blockchain (or protocol) economy have                     

unique properties , and so does ours. Our first core principle is: ​whoever works for the                             6

network owns the network ​. It is very similar to how the Bitcoin network incentivizes                           
miners; the Bitcoin network is generated by a set of nodes (called miners) that provide                             

the computing power necessary for a PoW type of consensus to occur. For providing                           7

this useful work, miners are rewarded by a specific amount of the network token that                             

represents the value of the network. In fact, all the Bitcoins that exist today were created                               

and, at some point, owned by miners. The Neufund platform employs the same model. In                             

our case, ​the ​useful work that creates our network is investment itself​. As a                           
consequence, and because we want our users to benefit from participation, ​transacting                       
participants become economic owners of the ecosystem ​ ​they create by investing​. 

Another important principle of a protocol economy, and our second core principle,                       

is that ​the ​network produces and controls access to a scarce resource​. For example,                           
Ethereum is a network of miners providing computing power and consensus necessary                       

5 We support secondary offerings and equity tokens, not coins, so adopting the currently popular “ICO”                               
name would be misleading. 
6 "Economics of Entangled Tokens – Neufund." 19 Jun. 2017,                   
https://blog.neufund.org/economics-of-entangled-tokens-9fc5b084e2d2​. Accessed 22 Aug. 2017. 
7 Proof of Work 

neufund.org September 2017 14 

https://blog.neufund.org/economics-of-entangled-tokens-9fc5b084e2d2
http://neufund.org/


 

for transactions and smart contract execution. Something similar takes place with the                       

Storj network for storage, Mysterium for VPN bandwidth, and so on. In the case of                             

Neufund there are two types of resources that must be produced and controlled. The                           

first one is capital, provided by investors, and the second one is equity of quality                             

companies. Both of those are scarce resources: you typically do not get money for free                             

and quality deals are hard to find as well. ​The mechanism that controls access to both                               
capital and company equity is the ETO, ​where investors acquire (and companies sell)                         
equity at a price negotiated on the market ​. The role of the Neumark token in this                               
process is not to control access, but to incentivise participants to provide more capital                           

and quality deals to the platform, and thus the entire ecosystem. 

The last principle of blockchain economies we discuss, and Neufund’s third core                       

principle, is: ​tokens represent network value ​. Generally speaking, this representation                   
works differently depending on the type of tokens deployed. In the case of utility tokens (                               

or “app tokens”), they set the baseline price of the fundamental resource. Consequently,                         

their total value ​should ​, but often does not, correspond to the total value of this resource.                               
In the case of Neumark the token represents economic rights, which will be explained in                             

detail later. In the case of some other token types the idea is that ​you own the network                                   
by owning tokens​. 

To wrap up, here are guidelines for Neufund Token Economy. 

1. Participants of the economy should become owners of ecosystem they create by                       

investing. 

2. Resources that run Neufund platform are both capital and quality deals. Access to                         
resources is controlled via Equity Token Offering (ETO). 

3. Value of Neufund platform is represented by Neumark. It enables platform                     

participants to hold share of its value and stimulates Platform growth via more                         

investments. 

   

neufund.org September 2017 15 

http://neufund.org/


 

 

5.1 Investment Transaction 
 

Figure 1, ​Investment Transaction 

 

There are two sides to an investment transaction. On one side there is the ​investor that                               
brings capital. In the case of investors on the Neufund platform, capital may be in the                               

form of any cryptocurrency, with only Ether supported initially, or stable coins, which we                           

will initially support natively through our EURT stable coin exchangeable for Euro. On the                           

other side we have the ​company that is, or plans to be, a limited company (or any legal                                   
form that has shares) registered in any jurisdiction. The company offers its shares for sale                             

by converting them to equity tokens (see ​7.2 ​). We call the mechanism that regulates                           
equity token price, and thus access to capital and equity, an Equity Token Offering (see                             

7.4 ​). During the ETO, potential investors decide to acquire equity tokens for a price that                             
was either negotiated by the market earlier or is subject to some market mechanism                           

within the ETO itself (e.g. a reverse dutch auction ). Once an investment decision is                           8

made, the investor acquires equity tokens for ETH or EURT, which is transferred to the                             

company’s account. Having become a legal shareholder of that company, the investor                       

now is granted rights to profit sharing, exit proceedings, and other things contributing to                           

an investor’s ROI. At the same moment as the transaction is confirmed, and in keeping                             

with the principles of the Neufund protocol economy, ​the investor claims newly created                         
Neumarks as a reward for providing capital​. 

8 "Introducing the Gnosis Token Launch – Gnosis." 12 Dec. 2016,                     
https://blog.gnosis.pm/introducing-the-gnosis-token-launch-3cc4cffb5098​. Accessed 22 Aug. 2017. 

neufund.org September 2017 16 

https://blog.gnosis.pm/introducing-the-gnosis-token-launch-3cc4cffb5098
http://neufund.org/


 

An important take away here is the role of Neumark. As you can see, ​it is not a typical                                     
protocol token ​: it neither sets the price of a resource, nor does it control access to it. In                                   
other words: Neumark also does not act as a gatekeeper to investment transactions. ​You                           
still invest freely with Ether and Euro-Tokens that you personally hold in your wallet.                           

Instead, ​Neumark is a reward for being a good ecosystem participant and helping it                           
grow by being active. 

 

5.2 Neumark Token Value 
In the previous chapters we explained that investors become economic ​owners of the                         
Neufund ecosystem when they receive rewards in the form of Neumark for each                         

completed investment transaction. The value of Neumarks results from fees and                     

participation in a platform pool of equity tokens, and thus gives economic ownership of                           

the network to said holders. 

1. With each successful ETO, a small fee is deducted from the invested amount. This                           

platform fee is then distributed to Neumark holders in proportion to amount of                         

Neumarks they own (“pro rata” ). 9

2. Within the same ETO, a small fee in form of company equity tokens is deducted                             

from the total number of tokens that were acquired. This ​token participation fee is                           
added to a ​platform portfolio of all companies ever to conduct a token sale on                             
the platform. 

9 http://www.investopedia.com/terms/p/pro-rata.asp 

neufund.org September 2017 17 

http://neufund.org/


 

Figure 2, ​Neumark Token Value 

 

The platform fee mechanism is a simple one. It is taken from the investment upon each                               

successful ETO on the platform and immediately distributed.  

The token participation fee is somewhat different, and more interesting. Company equity                       

tokens obtained this way are stored, jointly forming a platform portfolio of all companies                           

that perform an ETO on Neufund. Initially, during the ​portfolio building phase​, equity                         
tokens can only be added by collecting token fees. They can not and are not managed                               

afterwards. Neither the Platform Operator nor Neumark holders can liquidate their stake                       

or expand it by buying further assets from other holders. However, all economic rights of                             

Neumark holders are upheld: all proceeds from portfolio tokens will be distributed to                         

holders with the same mechanism as the platform fee. At some point in time, this platform                               

portfolio will store a substantial number of tokens, at which point it might be transformed                             

(subject to a joint decision by Neumark holders) into a different, perhaps more liquid                           

form. For example, it could become an automatically balanced index of the equity token                           

market, or perhaps assume a form where token holders can easily liquidate their                         

positions. 

neufund.org September 2017 18 

http://neufund.org/


 

In any case, thanks to the token participation fee, Neumark holders have a stake in                             

every ETO that happens on the platform ​, even without investing in those tokens                         
directly. This way, the Neumark creates strong alignment between investors, companies,                     

and the totality of investment. The value of Neumark grows as all are succeeding. 

Platform governance is carried out by the Platform Operator, which currently assumes                       

the form of a Germany based limited liability company (see ​8.2.1​). Neufund’s intention is                           
to gradually decentralize the operational governance of the platform, and distribute both                       

its ownership as well as its management to the community (more on this in ​DAOfication                             
of the Operator ​).  

As indicated, fees are set by the Platform Operator but the exact percentage has yet to                               

be determined. However, Neufund aims at a total fee smaller than regular off-chain                         

crowdfunding platforms take. 

But there are other components contributing to overall Neumark value: future revenues                       

from fees in addition to the value of existing and future platform portfolio value. But it                               

does not ​directly represent total value of companies that issued equity tokens on it. A                             
comparable relationship here is that of Ether to Ethereum tokens: Ether represents the                         

value of the entire smart contract executing network and its enabling potential, but not                           

the value of various token systems created on top of it. 

We intend to have Neumarks traded on major exchanges. Standard ERC20 transfer                       10

interface will be available immediately upon termination of the ​Initial Capital Building                       
phase. 

 

5.3 Neumark Issuance Model 
From the platform’s point of view, the primary role of the Neumark is to incentivise                             

investment. It should also reward risk taking by early adopters committing their money to                           

the platform. This has led us to make the following assumptions for our token issuance                             

model. 

1. We want to specifically incentivise the commitment of the first 1,5 billion Euro. 

10 https://github.com/ethereum/EIPs/pull/610 

neufund.org September 2017 19 

http://neufund.org/


 

2. We want Neumarks to be issued alongside investment transactions on the                     

platform so the total supply of Neumarks will increase over time. 

3. We want higher reward for early adopters - they will receive more Neumarks for                           

the same committed amount than latecomers. 

4. We want the number of tokens to be deterministically capped so any token holder                           

can compute his holdings (as a share of all Neumarks) in the future (no endless                             

dilution). 

Readers familiar with the design of the Bitcoin network understand that these                       

requirements lead to a solution similar to the familiar diminishing block reward scheme,                         

where mining increases in difficulty and the whole scheme stops at a certain maximum                           

number of tokens. In fact, we are using the following curve to model token issuance                             

(​please note that we may use approximates in the actual smart contract                       
implementation ​). 

upply 1 ) aps = ( − esteepness* cap
investedEURT

* c   

Here ​supply ​is the amount of tokens created until ​invested​EURT ​amount of Euro is                           
invested, with ​cap ​and ​steepness ​as two curve parameters. ​Cap ​is the maximum amount                           
of Neumark that will ever be created. ​Steepness determines the speed with which the                           
difficulty of obtaining Neumarks grows with ​invested​EURT​. In other words, it shows how                         
much early adopters are incentivised in relation to latecomers. 

neufund.org September 2017 20 

http://neufund.org/


 

 

Figure 3, ​Neumark Issuance Curve 

 

The actual ​steepness of -6.5 used by the platform (corresponding to ​initial reward ​of 6.5                             
Neumark/1 EURT), highly incentivises early adopters, which is made visible in the diagram                         

above. The first 100 mln EURT invested yields ~35% of the Neumark cap. The same                             

amount (100 mln) invested after 500 mln EURT have already been committed would yield                           

just ~3% of the cap. So Neumark “cost” in this example increases more than 10 times. 

The Platform will issue 1,5 bln Neumarks and that cap, combined with the actual                           

steepness, will effectively incentivise the first 1,5 bln EURT invested on the platform. Any                           

next EURT invested after that, gets less than 0.01 Neumark, at which point we consider                             

the reward incentive expired. Please note that the curve itself is asymptotic and thus the                             

cap will never be reached. This is obviously not the case with the actual, discrete                             

implementation available at the Neufund Github . 11

Now we can formally introduce the concept of ​Neumark marginal reward which is a                           
derivative of ​invested ​EURT 

11 https://github.com/Neufund/ico-contracts 

neufund.org September 2017 21 

http://neufund.org/


 

and we can observe that ​N​reward​(0​EUR​) = -steepness​.reward − teepnessN = e
steepness* cap

investedEURT

* s                
So the ​steepness of the curve is in fact equal to the initial reward of a Neumark​. 

As we can obtain ​invested​EURT value via inverted curve , we                 apinvestedEURT = steepness
ln( )cap

cap−supply

* c    

are able to compute ​Neumark marginal cost and reward amount just by knowing current                           
Neumark ​supply ​. 

For completeness, the following equation is used to compute the exact number of                         

Neumarks issued for a given investment size ​amount​EURT ​at ​supply ​of Neumarks already                       
issued: 

issued 1 ) ap upplyN = ( − esteepness* cap
invested +amountEURT EURT

* c − s   

Please note that both the curve equation and all the parameters may be changed slightly                             

or approximated due to EVM limitations. The details as determined by implementation                       12

constraints will be announced before the start of the ​Neufund ICBM ​. 

 

5.4 Neumark Distribution 
As Neumarks are issued for successful investment transactions, the following distribution                     

scheme is applied: ½ of issued Neumarks is assigned to the investor and ½ to the                               

Platform Operator.  

In general, the Platform Operator bears all costs of running the platform (including such                           

things as writing code and legal services). It must cover those costs from fees coming                             

from Neumarks received via distribution above. ​Operator does not get any “free” or                         
“pre-allocated” Neumarks nor does it receive any Ether or Euro during ​Initial Capital                         
Building ​. ​This approach makes Operator interests and incentives perfectly aligned                   
with interests of the platform, as is the intention behind Neufund’s model (more on                           

Platform Operator ​here​). 

Platform Operator may adjust the above distribution to optimize incentives in the future. It                           

may, for example, ​include companies as one of Neumark beneficiaries, should deal                       

12 Ethereum Virtual Machine 

neufund.org September 2017 22 

http://neufund.org/


 

flow need further incentivisation​. However, the Operator will never take a higher                       
percentage of Neumarks than the investor side.  

 

5.5 Example Fee & Token Distribution 
As an example of how this works in practice, we will calculate the distribution of fees and                                 

tokens in an ETO that takes place when no Neumarks have been issued yet. Remember                             

here that the Neumark cap is 1.5 bln tokens, and initial difficulty (corresponding to                           

steepness ​) is 6.5. 

In this example, the ETO size is 10 mln with an equity price of 1 EURT / Equity Token, so                                       

10 mln tokens are sold to investors. For the sake of the example we split investors into                                 

fund_investor that acquires 2 mln tokens and ​community_investors that acquire 8 mln.                       
tokens. According to the ​issuance curve equation​, this ETO generates N​issued​(10mln EURT)                       
= 63 611 791 Neumarks, which are ​distributed to investors and the Platform Operator in                             
equal measure of 31 805 895.5 Neumark each. Within the investor group, fund_investor                         

(which invested first) receives 6 471 914.5 and community_investors receive 25 333 981                         

Neumarks. 

It is at this point that fees are deducted. First, the platform fee of 3% is taken from the                                     

investment amount, which equals to 300 000 EURT. That fee is distributed to Neumark                           

holders as follows: fund_investor (holds ~10.17% of Neumarks) gets 30 522 EURT,                       

community_investors (hold ~ 39.83%) get 119 478 EURT. Platform Operator has ½ of                         

Neumarks and gets 150 000 EURT. The token participation fee of 2% is taken as well, =                                 

equaling 200 000 equity tokens. 

Then, funds and equity tokens are released to the issuing company and investors                         

respectively. The Company receives 9 700 000 EURT and investors 9 800 000 equity                           

tokens (where fund_investor gets 1 960 000 and community investors get 7 840 000                           

tokens). 

Please note that fees are distributed pro rata in relationship to Neumark holdings and                           

equity tokens are distributed pro rata in relationship to the investment amount​. 

neufund.org September 2017 23 

http://neufund.org/


 

6 Neufund Initial Capital Building Mechanism 
The Initial Capital Building Mechanism (ICBM) is a process corresponding somewhat to                       

ICOs of other blockchain projects. It kickstarts our investment ecosystem. However, it                       

works differently from the average initial token offering on Ethereum. The purpose of our                           

ICBM is to gather capital that is committed to be invested in future Token Offerings of                               

companies’ equity tokens (ETO).  

According to the ​principles of our protocol economy​, ​the only way you can get                           
Neumark is to perform work for the ecosystem ​, which for the investor is to provide                             
capital in the investment process. During the ICBM investors do exactly that: they commit                           

an amount of money to an investor’s individual account that will later fund company                           

ETOs. Such a commitment, from the perspective of the Platform, is no different than the                             

capital investment in the ​investment transaction​ itself, so a Neumark reward is granted. 

On the surface this ICBM looks like any other ICO. Investors send Ether to a smart                               

contract address that governs the whole process and tokens are issued in return. But                           

underneath things are different. ​An ​ICBM is ​not ​a token pre-sale​. The Platform Operator                           
is not selling Neumarks and then taking the money. ​All funds gathered during the ICBM                             
still belong to the investors which later make individual decisions which companies’                       

ETOs to fund ​. The Platform Operator is also not getting any pre-allocated Neumarks,                         
since it receives its share only when Neumarks are “mined” by investors. 

Figure 4, ​Commitment Process 

neufund.org September 2017 24 

http://neufund.org/


 

With that explanation fresh in mind we can examine the ICBM terms in detail. All                             

parameters are also summarized ​in this handy table​.  

1. During the ICBM investors get a Neumark reward by committing (putting aside)                       

funds to the Platform, before actually spending them on any specific investment.                       

An investor that commits funds after the ICBM has already concluded and then                         

invests in one or more ETOs, gets his Neumark reward only when he/she actually                           

invests. 

2. During the ICBM, Investors get their Neumark reward ​at the highest possible rate                         
(lowest possible cost) ​. The Neumark issuance mechanism offers higher rewards                   
for early adopters and decreasing rewards as committed (during ICBM) and                     

invested capital (after ICBM) on the Platform increases. The same logic applies to                         

the order of investors during the ICBM. It is the earliest opportunity to commit                           

capital to the Platform, thus the reward is highest for the first ICBM investor and                             

then slowly decreases with each further one. 

3. During the ICBM, issued Neumarks are distributed as described in the ​Neumark                       
Distribution ​ chapter. The split is ½ investor and ½ Platform Operator. 

4. The ICBM starts with a closed early phase for Neufund supporters and friends                         

whom we would like to have as our investors and as members of our ecosystem.                             

Those investors gain access to the ICBM before the general public. 

5. Investors lock funds on their individual accounts which are Ethereum smart                     

contracts. From that account funds can still be accessed by the investor but used                           

only on companies ETOs (which is basically a list of Ethereum smart contracts                         

published by the Platform). 

6. Neufund provides user interfaces which will make investment easy. Calling smart                     

contracts directly from other wallets will also be possible. 

7. Investors are protected in case they cannot find interesting deals. After a certain                         

period of time (​longstop date ​) all unspent locked funds can be released, subject                         
to the investor’s decision. Such released funds may be withdrawn from the                       

Platform. ​Every investor is required to return an amount of Neumarks that equals                         
the amount of Neumarks issued to him/her as a reward for commitment. This                         

amount is further reduced in proportion to funds actually invested. ​Example:                     
during an ICBM, our investor puts aside 1 000 000 EURT and receives 6 485 937                               

NEU. She later decides to invest in various ETOs, spending 600 000 EURT,                         

leaving 400 000 EURT still locked. After the longstop date passes she decides to                           

neufund.org September 2017 25 

http://neufund.org/


 

withdraw all remaining funds. She is required to return                 

before finally being able to withdraw 485 937 NEU  594 375 NEU  400 0001 000 000 * 6 = 2            

the remaining 400 000 EURT. Please also note that while one may simply hold all                             

tokens, investors that wish to withdraw their funds do not need to return the                           

originally acquired Neumarks to fulfil this requirement; Neumarks can also be                     

acquired on the secondary market (of course at market price) and are accepted                         

just the same. Neumarks are fully fungible. 

8. Investors may use an ​escape hatch to release funds before the longstop date. In                           
that case they will pay a certain penalty which will be distributed to other Neumark                             

holders as compensation for decreasing the overall ecosystem value. As in the                       

case of a longstop date activation, an amount of Neumarks corresponding to the                         

amount of locked funds before the penalty is applied, must be returned. Please                         

see the example above. 

9. Funds locked during the ICBM gain priority access to company ETOs, so                       

investment tickets acquired for those funds will be executed before tickets coming                       

from the general public (​first look right​). 
10. All investors participating in the ICBM are subject to the Neumark Token Holder                         

Agreement the terms of which correspond to ICBM smart contracts terms, a                       

construct identical to that launched with Neufund’s ESOP . A generic version of                       13

agreement will be available for download on the ICBM commitment website and                       

distributed in personalized form after the ICBM ends. 

11. There is no vesting scheme applied to trading or rights to fees. ​An ERC20                           
Transfer interface will be enabled when the ​Ether phase ends​, and fee distribution                         
will start with the first successful Equity Token Offering of a company. On that                           

event we also distribute fees coming from the use of escape hatches, if any. 

12. To participate in a company Equity Token Offering, investors need to provide                       

identification documents ( ​investor KYC ​). The platform user interface will provide                   
easy and secure ways to perform KYC well before the first ETO starts. Escape                           

hatch and longstop date mechanisms are available for investors that are not                       

willing or not able to perform KYC. There is no other unlock mechanism available                           

for such investors. 

13 "Tokenizing startup equity, Part 1 — Employee Stock Options Plan ...." 17 May. 2017,                             
https://blog.neufund.org/tokenizing-startup-equity-part-1-employee-incentive-options-plan-esop-on-ethereu
m-blockchain-dce2416f4505​. Accessed 31 Aug. 2017. 

neufund.org September 2017 26 

https://blog.neufund.org/tokenizing-startup-equity-part-1-employee-incentive-options-plan-esop-on-ethereum-blockchain-dce2416f4505
https://blog.neufund.org/tokenizing-startup-equity-part-1-employee-incentive-options-plan-esop-on-ethereum-blockchain-dce2416f4505
http://neufund.org/


 

13. The platform KYC process supports both individuals and organizations of virtually                     

any type (natural and legal persons). 

14. Right now, and until it changes, US citizens are not allowed to participate in the                             

ICBM. US investors will also not be able to complete KYC with all the                           

consequences stated above. 

 

6.1 Ether & EURO Token ICBM Phases 
 

Figure 5, ​Initial Capital Building Mechanism Phases 

 

We plan Initial Capital Building in two phases. ​The first phase is addressed to                           
individuals and organizations that hold Ether or other cryptocurrencies and are able to                         

manage their wallets properly. This means that they control their private keys and are                           

able to execute smart contract methods by sending transaction data, the same as with                           

any other modern ICO. ​The ​second phase is addressed to individuals and                       
organizations that are willing to invest in the form of EUR or other fiat currencies. Thus                               

it is catered to blockchain newcomers or organisations (like most classical VC funds) that                           

have legal restrictions placed upon them regarding the currencies they may invest with.                         

Below we summarize both ICBM phases and how they relate. 

1. All terms enumerated in the previous chapter are identical for Ether and EURT                         

phases. 

2. Both phases are separately capped but the EURT phase comes after the Ether                         

phase. This means that Ether investors are rewarded with a ​better Neumark ratio                         

neufund.org September 2017 27 

http://neufund.org/


 

per amount of committed funds than EURT investors. This functions as a reward                         

for taking greater risk by committing their funds earlier. 

3. EURT phase investors may identify themselves (KYC) before they commit funds                     

(KYC is required before the funds are actually invested). This removes the risk of                           

not being able to do KYC and being forced to use the escape hatch on locked                               

funds. 

4. As mentioned, the Ether phase of the ICBM works like a typical Ethereum ICO: you                             

participate by executing a transaction to the ICBM smart contract. If your wallet is                           

able to inject the web3.js library into the ICBM commitment page, you may even                           

participate directly from the browser. 

5. The EURT phase is designed for individuals not familiar with blockchain and                       

Ethereum (like off-chain business angels) or organizations (like classical VCs).                   

Read more on the EURT investment process in the ​EURT Lifecycle​ chapter. 

For more information on Euro Token and how it circulates on Neufund platform, ​please                           
read here ​. 

6.2 Neumark Trading on Secondary Market 
Here we provide a short recap on the terms of secondary trading of Neumark. 

1. There is an ERC20 transfer interface and hence trading is enabled when Ether                         14

phase of ICBM ends, specifically when the cap or end date are reached. 

2. There is no vesting or other limitations on Neumark trading. All Neumarks issued                         

during the ICBM process are transferable. 

3. It is the Platform Operator’s intention to facilitate trade by listing Neumark at major                           

exchanges, both centralized and decentralized ones.  

For further details on legal and regulatory aspects of Neumarks, we ask the reader to                             

consult ​Chapter 8.3.2 ​. 

 

6.3 Important ICBM Terms 
Neumark issuance parameters 

14 https://github.com/ethereum/eips/issues/20 

neufund.org September 2017 28 

http://neufund.org/


 

Maximum Neumark Supply  1 500 000 000 Neumarks 

Initial reward (steepness)  6.5 Neumark / EURT 

Initial cost (reward inverse)  ~0.15385 EURT / Neumark 

Initial distribution  ½ Investor, ½ Platform Operator 

Neumark Symbol  NEU 

Neumark Precision  18 decimals 

 

ICBM Ether Phase 

Start date  Autumn 2017. Exact date to be announced on               
https://commit.neufund.org 

Length in Days  30 

Maximum ticket size  No maximum ticket size 

Minimum ticket size  1 ETH 

Neumark cap  869 474 423 (see ​equation​) 

Safety (max) cap   200 mln EURT(*) 

Neumark reward  Along the curve, first come better deal 

KYC required to participate       
in the ICBM? 

No 

(*) Constant Ether to EUR rate will be applied during ICBM phase. Rate will be announced 
together with ICBM smart contracts deployment and cannot be changed later. 
 

Commitment Account Parameters 

Longstop (unlock) date  18 months (of 30 days length) 

Escape Hatch available 
from 

End of ICBM 

Escape Hatch Penalty  10% of not invested funds 

Unlock requirements  Must burn Neumarks corresponding to not invested funds 

neufund.org September 2017 29 

http://neufund.org/


 

KYC required to invest in 
equity tokens? 

Yes, ​read more 

Are organization KYC 
supported? 

Yes, ​read more 

 

 

   

neufund.org September 2017 30 

http://neufund.org/


 

7 Investment Platform Description 

7.1 Fundraising with Stable Coin (EURT) & Ether 
The Price volatility of “cryptocurrencies” with regard to well established fiat currencies                       

and the off-chain costs of running a business are a problem for long term investment in                               

equity tokens on which Neufund is initially focused. It may be acceptable for pure                           

blockchain businesses to risk such volatility but for off-chain companies to keep funds in                           

Ether may be shortsighted, since it is subject to substantial drops or surges in value over                               

the course of a few days. Investors, in particular professional ones, face similar problems.                           

Calculating a ROI is virtually impossible when changes in value depend much more on                           

the performance of the base “currency” instead of investment performance. Neufund’s                     

solution to this problem is to ​denominate all investments in Euro, which serves as the                             
base currency of the platform ​. In particular, it means that: 

● investment amounts on the ​Investment Agreement​ are stated in Euro, 
● the price of an equity token during its Token Offering is calculated in Euro, 
● the ​Neumark reward​ is calculated based on the investment amount in Euro, 

no matter in which currency investment actually happens. 

As has been stated before, the investment transaction itself may happen both in                         

Euro-Tokens and Ether, and at the end of its ETO the company will receive funds in both                                 

tokens (unless the terms of the ETO specified otherwise): 

● Investment transactions may happen in Euro-Token (EURT), a stable internal                   
token pegged 1:1 to Euro (as explained ​here​). The price of a given equity token is                               
denominated in Euro so that the number of equity tokens acquired by an investor                           

can be directly calculated. 

● Investment transactions with Ether are slightly more complex. The investment                   
amount is recalculated in Euro (via a rate from an Oracle) at the moment the                             

transaction is mined. That amount is then used to calculate the amount of equity                           

tokens acquired in that transactions. Ether is kept by the ETO smart contract until                           

the offering concludes and then released to the company. ​In the case of Ether                           
investments, the company bears volatility risk during the ETO period​. 

neufund.org September 2017 31 

http://neufund.org/


 

As stated above, Ether investments bring a short term volatility risk to a company. When                             

the funds are released, they may be immediately converted via Neufund’s ​internal token                         
converter ​. ​However, to eliminate volatility risk completely, a company can decide                     
which currencies its ETO supports​. 

● In ​EURT only ETO volatility risk is eliminated, but also investors that invest                         
exclusively with cryptocurrencies are discouraged. 

● In ​EURT and ETH ETO​, a company addresses the largest possible capital pool but                           
with a short term Ether volatility risk. 

7.1.1 EURT Lifecycle 

 
Figure 6, ​ EUR-Token Lifecycle 

 

neufund.org September 2017 32 

http://neufund.org/


 

Please note that due to legal reasons: 

● EURT does not support peer transfers between platform participants.  
● EURT may be used only for commitment and investment transactions and to                       

collect fees. 

● EURT may only be held by individuals and organizations with completed KYC. As                         
a consequence, any fee or revenue disbursed is hold by the platform until such                           

process is completed. 

7.2 Equity Tokens 
Neufund allows both well established and new companies to get funding by issuing                         

blockchain-based equity tokens. These tokens are issued as a result of an ​investment                         
process that, in many ways, is similar to the process that a startup goes through when                               

funded classically. In particular, a company must prove to investors that its shares/tokens                         

have value. 

The main difference is that during this process a part or the entirety of the company’s                               

shares will be presented as ​equity tokens ​. This provides significant benefits to both the                           
investors and company founders like liquidity and reduced legal costs. 

Neufund will release guides that help companies apply for funding in this way. In the                             

following paragraphs we discuss equity tokens as they live on the Ethereum blockchain.                         

For a legal construct, in particular how the link between tokens and equity is established,                             

and how token holders are represented off-chain, please refer to ​Chapter 8.3​. 

Neufund feels strongly about supporting equity tokens as opposed to entangled                     

tokens, for reasons explained elsewhere . 15

7.2.1 Equity Token Value 
Equity tokens may be acquired by an investor during an Equity Token Offering. It’s worth                             

stressing that anyone can become an investor, be it a professional VC, a regular person                             

with Euros, individuals owning some Bitcoins, etc. 

For all investors, such tokens have the following value: 

15 "Economics of Entangled Tokens – Neufund." 19 Jun. 2017,                   
https://blog.neufund.org/economics-of-entangled-tokens-9fc5b084e2d2​. Accessed 31 Aug. 2017. 

neufund.org September 2017 33 

https://docs.google.com/document/d/1wIusrLpXS_qIhrH19F7fzaIZ7oijQkLZuTjVxgu3ICQ/edit#heading=h.cv7w14dlz9wm
https://docs.google.com/document/d/1wIusrLpXS_qIhrH19F7fzaIZ7oijQkLZuTjVxgu3ICQ/edit#heading=h.cv7w14dlz9wm
https://blog.neufund.org/economics-of-entangled-tokens-9fc5b084e2d2
http://neufund.org/


 

● They represent equity in an off-chain company with terms specified in the Investment                         

Agreement and its corresponding smart contract. At that point, the value of the equity                           

itself has already been assessed by the investors after the presentation of a proposal                           

by the founders and subsequent discussion. 

● They entitle their holder to a stake in the company’s governance. The Neufund                         

platform provides the tools and legal framework for on-chain shareholder resolutions,                     

reporting, and other functions and decisions (see ​Company On-chain Governance ​). 

Equity tokens are in principle transferable, hence may be traded ​. The Neufund                       
platform will enable such trading capability. 

A company may apply for more funding and dilute existing token- and shareholders​.                         
This requires a passed shareholder resolution and must comply with the terms set out in                             

the Investment Agreement. 

Investors profit from proceeds paid by the companies which are automatically                     

distributed by smart contracts ( ​more on distribution in Chapter 7.6​).  

By acquiring equity tokens, the company’s investors become an indirect party to the                         

Investment Agreement and enter indirectly a legally binding agreement with the                     

company. This agreement secures his/her rights as an indirect shareholder. 

7.2.2 On-chain Governance 
The Investment Agreement ​requires the company to carry out shareholder resolutions                     
on Platform for on-chain investors ​. Off-chain investors still vote on paper and results are                           
merged to get the final answer. There is no overlapping and no one votes twice. In the                                 

case of fully on-chain companies, where all shares are represented as equity tokens,                         

paper voting is not necessary. The voting procedure complies with those usually found in                           

typical shareholder agreement. 

There are a few interesting decisions with on-chain consequences that can be made this                           

way: 

● Applying for more funding via Neufund platform 

● Enabling trading of an equity token 

● Converting more equity to tokens 

neufund.org September 2017 34 

https://docs.google.com/document/d/1wIusrLpXS_qIhrH19F7fzaIZ7oijQkLZuTjVxgu3ICQ/edit#heading=h.65xp5p1g3dig
http://neufund.org/


 

● Performing end of life events like exit or company’s closing 

The Investment Agreement requires companies to report to token holders on a                       

regular basis ​; reporting obligations will not exceed standards in early venture capital                       
financing rounds and will take into account that such reporting is public. Companies                         

should be aware that due to having many investors, whose identity might change when                           

secondary trading is permitted, such reports should be treated as visible by anyone. 

7.3 Protocol Tokens 
While Neufund’s clear priority is to make ETO of Equity Tokens possible, Neufund                         

platform may in the future support any protocol token. These are tokens that have a                             

strong representation within the current and/or future state of the Ethereum ecosystem                       

and that represent a voucher or right to use a specific service or network. From the                               

platform perspective, the most important distinction between these and the equity                     

tokens are token holder rights and how they are secured both on-chain and off-chain.                           

Current token offerings typically lack any form of off-chain rights. Some of that may                           

change fast with the establishment and growing acceptance of the SAFT agreement, a                         16

first version of which has already been trialed during the Filecoin ICO . Neufund may                           17

adopt similar agreements, aligned specifically with European regulations, and open its                     

decentralized capital pool to any type of token. We describe the technical side of such                             

token offerings in ​Chapter  7.11.5 ​. 

7.4 Investment Terms & Investment Agreement 
The Neufund platform uses ​investment terms with just a few simple parameters to set.                           
Investors will acquire equity tokens on such terms during any ETO. ​As token offerings                           
are addressed to any and all potential investors, the terms of a particular investment                           

will be stored on the ledger. Such transparency should, in our opinion, ​make terms fair                             
by creating a market for equity tokens with competitive prices for companies at                         

different lifecycle stages ​. Both investors and companies overall are likely to benefit from                         

16 
https://coinlist.co/static/media/Protocol%20Labs%20-%20SAFT%20for%20Filecoin%20Token%20Presale.7
d759ef3.pdf 
17 ​https://coinlist.co/currencies/filecoin/overview 

neufund.org September 2017 35 

https://coinlist.co/static/media/Protocol%20Labs%20-%20SAFT%20for%20Filecoin%20Token%20Presale.7d759ef3.pdf
https://coinlist.co/static/media/Protocol%20Labs%20-%20SAFT%20for%20Filecoin%20Token%20Presale.7d759ef3.pdf
https://coinlist.co/currencies/filecoin/overview
http://neufund.org/


 

this additional information available on-chain compared to the currently closed                   

investment ecosystem. 

Simple investment terms mean that a company can simply say how many shares it wants                             

to sell (in the form of equity tokens) and for what price. This specification may happen in                                 

a variety of ways, depending on the particular ETO price setting mechanism employed.                         

Following the classical approach, just two parameters are necessary: ​company valuation                     
and ​percentage of shares ​that company wants to sell in form of equity tokens, the                             
combination of which results in a single value called ​price of token (in EURT). There are                               
various ​secondary parameters that every ETO has, like minimum and maximum cap,                       
deadlines, minimum and maximum ticket sizes, etc. Please note that this public sale                         

makes other previously unavailable token price mechanisms available, such as the                     

reverse Dutch auction where price is set by investor demand. Neufund will provide such                           

mechanisms next to the classical approach. It will also allow developers to implement                         

custom pricing schemes ​. 

The Investment Agreement is signed by company founders and a Trustee when ETO                         

succeeds. Please refer to ​legal section for jurisdiction and formal requirements. From the                         
point of view of the platform participants, this agreement sets the following: 

● How many tokens were actually sold (amount between minimum and maximum                     
caps) and for what (EURT) price, ​specifying in effect the percentage of equity                         
that investors acquired and determining the company’s post-investment               

valuation ​. 
● Will establish investor rights as shareholders of the company. 
● When signed, funds are released to the company and equity tokens to investors. 

7.5 Equity Token Offerings 
During a company’s ETO, investors acquire equity tokens according to investment terms                       

that are part of the ETO smart contract. These terms’ parameters are simple but leave                             

room for configuration like caps, timing etc. The platform will also allow setting up                           

different pricing mechanisms for equity, ranging from classical valuation methods (price                     

in EURT per share) to market-driven schemes like the reverse Dutch auction (for                         

information on implementing your own pricing mechanisms read ​Chapter 7.11​). 

neufund.org September 2017 36 

http://neufund.org/


 

  All funds that are gathered during an ETO are kept in smart contract escrow until                             

the final results are known, specifically until it is known whether the minimum cap or price                               

per token was reached. Once that happens, the Investment Agreement is signed by                         

startup founders and a ​Trustee on paper or electronically, depending on the jurisdiction.                         
At that moment the following happens: 

1. The Neumark reward is “mined” and issued to investors and the Platform Operator 

2. All fees are collected and distributed to Neumark holders 

3. Funds are released to the company 

4. Equity tokens are released to investors 

Please note that all fees and tokens must be actively claimed by investors. This is due to                                 

the gas limit of the Ethereum network. The Platform user interface will provide the                           

necessary notifications for such events. 

In the case of an unsuccessful ETO where the minimum cap or price of equity token are                                 

not reached, all funds are returned to investors. 

 

7.6 Fees & Proceeds Distribution 
The Platform provides a mechanism for the distribution of fees and proceeds to token                           

holders. Since the primary value of equity tokens is economic, the distribution of                         

proceeds is the investors’ fundamental right. These proceeds are deposited into an                       

equity token distribution pool where they may be claimed by token holders. Proceeds                         

may be deposited in Ether or EURT (the ​internal token converter is available for                           
conversion). The same applies to withdrawal. ​Investors that sell their tokens on a                         
secondary market will still be able to claim proceeds deposited into the equity token                           

distribution pool before the sell transaction concludes ​. 

The same rules apply to fees distributed to Neumark holders. In that case the platform                             

may apply an additional distribution mechanism that prevents large amounts of funds to                         

be handed over in short time. Instead it would hand them out according to some                             

diminishing scheme. 

neufund.org September 2017 37 

http://neufund.org/


 

7.7 Internal Token Converter 
Neufund, via cooperation with one of the leading exchanges, will provide a service to                           

convert between EURT and ETH ​within the single user account​. The conversion rate will                           
be close to actual market price of the exchange pair at this partner exchange. The                             

converter service will try to optimize volume over time. It exists solely to let users                             

withdraw and deposit funds in their prefered token and is not suitable for professional                           

trade. 

 

7.8 Investor Perspective 

7.8.1 Investor Qualification & KYC Requirements 
ETO investors can be individuals or organizations. We have standard KYC/AML                     

procedures like you would see on a typical cryptocurrency exchange. Specifically we                       

require individuals to provide 

● a scan of their passport, 
● the country of issuance, 
● their full name, 
● their date of birth, 
● their residency address, and 
● a confirmation that they represent themselves. 

Passports from the U.S. or other unsupported countries will be rejected. If a user wants to                               

commit and withdraw Euros, we also require a bank account that is in the name of the                                 

user and in the country of passport issuance. 

For institutional investors we require representatives to provide 

● complete individual KYC, 
● a scan of the trade register excerpt or secretary’s certificate of incorporation or                         

another document that confirms existence of the company. Such a document                     

should contain the following information (if not, those should be provided                     

separately): 

○ the name of the company, 

neufund.org September 2017 38 

http://neufund.org/


 

○ the country of incorporation and company address, 
○ the legal form of the company, 
○ the company’s registration number, 
○ authorization that the representative is acting on behalf of the company                     

(being a CEO, fund manager etc.), 

● the company's VAT number (EU only). 

7.8.2 Professional Investor Features 
Platform will provide increasing number of investors’ features, below are those that are                         

currently both well defined and interesting. 

● Follow other investor (“ ​side car deal”​). This shows investments of a certain                       
investment and gives follower the opportunity to co-invest (always subject to his                       

full discretion) if he believes in investment decisions of leading investor. Side car                         

deals also increases impact of leading investor. 

● Bring your own deals (“​green shoe ​”). Both investors and companies may bring                       
pre-arranged deals to the platform where their pre-arranged transaction happens                   

before ETO opens to others. This is beneficial both to pre-arranged participants                       

(they may leverage platform capital pool to complete the deal) and the rest of                           

ecosystem (quality deals are coming to the platform, which otherwise happen in                       

private syndicates). 

● Priority access to ETO (“​first look right​”) - as described in ​Chapter 6 - exclusively                             
for investment from funds locked during the ICBM. 

 

7.9 Company Perspective 

7.9.1 Company Registration & Legal Due Diligence 
In order to be able to raise capital through the Neufund Platform, the company will have                               

to fulfill some basic requirements, including the following: 

● It has to be an incorporated limited liability company, 
● It has to provide basic data required from institutional investors (see ​KYC                       

requirements above ​). 

neufund.org September 2017 39 

http://neufund.org/


 

These data are collected and verified by Neufund Platform. 

7.9.2 Company Cap Table 
The Transparent Trustee (see 8.2.6 below) is a technical entity that acts in accordance                           

with instructions given by equity token holders. It becomes a shareholder, hence is listed                           

in the shareholder list or registered with the designated registry (depending on the                         

company’s jurisdiction). 

7.9.3 The Fundraising Process described 
In its basic design, the fundraising process on the Neufund Platform is similar to regular                             

ICO processes already familiar to the crypto community and Blockchain ecosystem. The                       

Platform, however, provides a range of tools and services to make the process smoother,                           

transparent, legally sound, and following the “trustless trust” principle.  

It starts off-chain when a company presents itself to the community of investors. This is                             

an important part of the process, and the time where a new project can be discussed by                                 

the community. The community’s interest, hesitations, and insights are taken into account                       

so that a decision can be made on whether the offer is formally considered on-chain. 

● The Founder must present and defend his/her idea on a public forum (e.g. Reddit) 

● The Community verifies various claims made by the project (we assume here that                         
companies worth investing in will be able to generate enough attention), as do                         

community experts that are compensated for their due diligence through Platform                     

mechanisms 

Any company can get funding, except those whose business activity consists of illegal                         

economic activity, i.e. any production, trade, or other activity, which is illegal under the                           

laws or regulations applicable to the Platform or the relevant company or entity, including                           

without limitation, human cloning for reproduction purposes; or which substantially                   

focuses on: (i) the production of and trade in tobacco and distilled alcoholic beverages                           

and related products; (ii) the financing of the production of and trade in weapons and                             

ammunition of any kind; (iii) casinos and equivalent enterprises; (iii) the research,                       

development or technical applications relating to electronic data programs or solutions,                     

which aim specifically at supporting any activity referred above; internet gambling and                       

neufund.org September 2017 40 

http://neufund.org/


 

online casinos; or pornography, or are intended to enable to illegally enter into electronic                           

data networks; or downloading electronic data. 

 

Next, legal due diligence takes place (startup KYC)​ (as described in ​Chapter 7.9.1​). 

The Neufund platform uses a simple, fair, and public term sheet template​. By default                           
company will only specify basic parameters (see ​Chapter 7.4 ​) like number of shares sold,                           
price of equity token (valuation), investment caps, etc. 

The Company may secure an initial ticket from a particular investor on the platform,                           

but this is not required. 

The Equity Token Offering phase comes with first look rights. ​This is a fundamental                           
part of the investment process during which investors acquire equity tokens thus                       

obtaining shareholder rights in companies (see ​Chapter 7.5​). 

When the token offering is completed, an ​Investment Agreement is automatically                     
generated ​from the terms and results of the token offering are stored on the ledger then                               
signed ​by the founders and the Trustee ​. The document is scanned and preserved by                           
both parties. The actual form requirement depends on the jurisdiction applicable to the                         

company. 

A hash of the scan will act as a digital proof of the signature made on paper and will                                     

be stored in the smart contract corresponding to the Investment Agreement​. When                       
this happens, the investment process is ​successfully completed and the company gains                       
access to the gathered funds. 

7.10 Platform Security 
Neufund’s user base is expected to include both experts and novices to blockchain                         

applications, and both high and low value accounts. To provide a smooth experience                         

while guaranteeing security for all these users, we plan to support three different                         

authentication mechanisms. In addition, all our users benefit from a protective wallet                       

contract. 

neufund.org September 2017 41 

http://neufund.org/


 

7.10.1 Two Factor Authentication 
For users that are new to the Ethereum blockchain, we provide a simple two factor                             

signup using an email address, a passphrase, and a time-based one-time password                       

compatible with Google Authenticator. On account creation, a recovery code will be sent                         

to the user’s email address. To login, the user provides the email address, the                           

passphrase, and the six digit one-time code. To sign a transaction, a fresh one-time code                             

needs to be provided. In the event that either the passphrase or the one-time code is                               

lost, the recovery code can be used. 

The private keys are generated on Neufund servers and stored there in encrypted form                           

using the user’s authentication factors in the encryption process. They will only be                         

decrypted temporarily during signing operations and never leave the server’s volatile                     

memory. The servers will run on dedicated hardware to avoid cross-VM attacks. The                         

servers will run in their own security domains, separate from other services. 

This is the simplest option that is familiar to all users, and a good way for them to                                   

experiment. While we strive for maximum security, ​we do not recommend this method for                           
assets you are not willing to lose ​. Loss of multiple authentication factors results in                           
permanent loss of the key and all attached funds. A breach of our signing server means                               

potential theft of all the keys that are used during the breach period. 

7.10.2 Authentication using web3 
For users that are familiar with the Ethereum blockchain and want to control their own                             

security, we provide a web3 standard authentication mechanism. The user can connect                       

using any web3 enabled browser, such as Parity, Metamask, and Mist. All transactions                         

are signed by the user’s wallet. 

This is the most advanced option as the user is fully responsible for keeping their signing                               

keys confidential and maintaining proper backups. Neufund has no ability to recover                       

accounts. We urge high value users to use the Neukey method, or at least set up their                                 

own hardware wallet. 

7.10.3 Authentication using Neukey 
For high value accounts we recommend using the Neukey, a hardware wallet based on                           

the Ledger Nano, provided directly by Neufund. The Nano provides great security by                         

neufund.org September 2017 42 

http://neufund.org/


 

design. To further add to the security, the devices are notarized by Taylor Wessing, a                             

Berlin based notarial office. The notary configures the devices and stores the backup                         

codes. This frees the user from doing this laborious and error-prone step. The devices                           

are uniquely numbered and tracked through the notary smart contract. Only the owner                         

can ask the notary to block the Neukey or retrieve the backup code. 

7.10.4 Account Protection using Watched Wallet 
As a second layer of defence after the authentication mechanism, all our users will have                             

a wallet contract that holds their assets on their behalf. For transactions that exceed                           

certain criteria, there will be a 24 hour delay. During this time the user can still cancel the                                   

transaction. During this time Neufund can also decide to delay the transaction by a                           

further 7 days. This allows Neufund to protect the user against malicious and accidental                           

transactions, but prevents Neufund from controlling or permanently blocking an account. 

In the worst case scenario of an account being compromised and transactions issued to                           

steal funds, the 24 hour delay starts. During this delay, Neufund or the user spot the                               

transaction (assisted by monitoring tools and confirmation emails) and Neufund blocks                     

the transaction. The user now has 7 days to recover the account and cancel the                             

transactions. After that, they can be moved to a new safe account (exact delay periods                             

still subject to change). 

 

7.11 Developer’s Perspective - Neufund Investment           

Protocol 
The Neufund platform comes packaged in a UI that is friendly towards people new to                             

blockchain. Below the hood, however, it will be an extensible investment protocol that                         

allows developers to build funds, companies, and custom token offering processes;                     

developers may also make use of other solutions that target those problems such as                           

Melonport, Augur, Aragon, and others. Neufund provides several core services like the                       

revenue sharing equity token, KYC, stable coin, token offering with legal backing, and                         

others on top of which several interesting features may be built. 

neufund.org September 2017 43 

http://neufund.org/


 

7.11.1 Extensible Fund Governance 
Neufund will provide a basic contract for fund management, that allows users to invest                           

funds and collect fees or other proceeds. But both decision making process and                         

proceeds distribution mechanism are abstracted and can be extended as needed. 

● Initially, Neufund provides a rudimentary decision making implementation, where                 
single or several partners can make independent decisions to invest funds and                       

proceeds are manually disbursed by any of the partners. 

● The Melonport protocol can be used to establish a fund where Neufund’s ETOs                         
function as an asset universe. It may also involve building an exchange module                         18

to let Melonport funds participate in Neufund’s primary market. 

● It is also possible to implement decentralized investment decision making using                     
for example the Gnosis futarchy protocol. 

7.11.2 Tokenized Fund 
The ultimate goal in extending fund governance is the implementation of a tokenized                         

fund. The structure of such a fund has been researched by us and was presented in                               

version 1 of this whitepaper. In essence, such a fund works as follows: 

● The Fund issues its own tokens that are acquired by the Limited Partners. The                           
collected funds form an investment pool from which investments in ETOs are                       

performed. 

● The Fund is managed by Fund Managers that are making actual investment                       
decisions. Managers may be elected by Limited Partners using predetermined and                     

customizable mechanisms like liquid democracy. 

● Proceeds are distributed to the Limited Partners proportional to the amount of                       
fund tokens they hold. Fund Managers may take management fees or carried                       

interest. 

18 "GitHub - melonproject/greenpaper/greenpaper/blob/master: Melon Protocol Greenpaper."             
https://github.com/melonproject/greenpaper/blob/master/melonprotocol.pdf​. Accessed 1 Sep. 2017. 

neufund.org September 2017 44 

https://github.com/melonproject/greenpaper/blob/master/melonprotocol.pdf
http://neufund.org/


 

Currently, Neufund is not actively developing the above Fund structure, yet is able and                           

willing to cooperate on this as well as open its investment ecosystem to tokens                           

representing participation in funds. 

7.11.3 Custom Company Governance 
Neufund’s core contracts for equity tokens establish the fundamental shareholder rights                     

like ownership of off-chain shares, right to proceeds, and shareholder voting rights.                       

Company governance is a complicated thing however, and the Neufund investment                     

protocol will be open to other projects that deal specifically with this matter. Currently                           

Aragon network is already providing support for custom tokens , so company                     19

governance may use their solution. With a bit of integration any Aragon organization may                           

use the Neufund platform to do an ETO, or to create a link from on-chain tokens to                                 

off-chain shares of the real company. 

7.11.4 Alternative ETO Pricing Mechanisms 
As described in ​5.1 and ​7.5 ​, there are many ways in which the price of an equity token                                   
may be determined during an ETO. The classical approach is to negotiate and set the                             

price of the equity before the token offering starts. Due to the open nature of the ETO,                                 

the classical way may not be sufficient and, for example, some type of auction where the                               

price is set by investor demand may be a better option. The Neufund protocol is open to                                 

implementation of custom price discovery mechanisms within token offerings and                   

Neufund is planning to implement several of them (see ​Chapter 9.1​). 

7.11.5 Custom Tokens & Token Offerings 
The most advanced kind of customization is to add new token types and token offering                             

processes, as it involves a lot of conceptual and legal work. What are the token holder                               

rights? What is the token’s regulatory status? What is stated in the Investment                         

Agreement? The Investment Protocol itself can be easily extended, but answering these                       

questions is the hard part. The following are two ideas that Neufund has researched: 

1. A token representing Limited Partners rights in a tokenized investment fund​. As                       
mentioned above this fund structure can be implemented on the Neufund                     

19 "The Governance Release, Alpha 0.3 – Aragon." 30 Mar. 2017,                     
https://blog.aragon.one/the-governance-release-aragon-alpha-0-3-%EF%B8%8F-bdea6def1ab​. Accessed 1     
Sep. 2017. 

neufund.org September 2017 45 

https://blog.aragon.one/the-governance-release-aragon-alpha-0-3-%EF%B8%8F-bdea6def1ab
http://neufund.org/


 

platform, but it requires a custom token and a custom investment agreement in                         

the Fund. 

2. Any protocol token backed by a SAFT agreement​. If the SAFT agreement                       
survives real world trials and legal & regulatory scrutiny, Neufund may decide to                         

implement an option to invest in any protocol token, thereby enabling investment                       

in tokens that represents rights other than equity.   

neufund.org September 2017 46 

http://neufund.org/


 

8 Neufund Organisational Structure & Legal           

Considerations 
Neufund is not only a technological platform, but also a legal one. The legal dimension                             

means that Neufund: 

● allows equity of real-world companies to be represented as tokens living on the                         
blockchain, 

● allows anyone to invest in such tokens, 
● comprises a framework of legal and smart contracts that makes token issuance                       

and investment in such tokens binding both on-chain and off-chain, 

● delivers tools for investors and companies to undertake legally recognizable                   
actions on-chain, and 

● gives Neumark holders legal rights, as expressed in smart contracts and off-chain                       
legal documentation. 

Further details on legal aspects and organisational structure of Neufund follow below. 

8.1 Neufund’s Approach to Legal Issues 
In the idea behind Neufund, legal matters have played a great role from the very                             

beginning. That is why we build Neufund by using not only ​blockchain ​and other                           
cutting-edge technologies, but also utilizing ​legal innovation ​. 

Neufund is about treating regulations seriously and at the same time moving forward                         

with our innovative agenda. We are looking far into the future of investing. At the same                               

time, we are aware of potential limitations of legal frameworks developed in the past. In                             

practice this means that each of our steps is carefully analysed from the legal                           

perspective. We also engage in dialogue with lawmakers and regulators, in Europe and                         

beyond. 

Some jurisdictions have already recognised the potential of blockchain technology for                     

financing innovation and are planning to adjust regulations accordingly. Others lag                     

behind and apply restrictive approach. We are sure that sooner or later the former                           

approach will prevail. 

neufund.org September 2017 47 

http://neufund.org/


 

We are monitoring legislative and regulatory developments in many countries and                     

actively take part in the ongoing discussion regarding regulatory treatment of tokens,                       

ICOs, etc . ​However, we have consciously chosen not to engage in regulatory arbitrage,                         20

that is looking for the most favourable country in terms of regulations. Neufund will                           

initially operate from Germany, which offers a sound legal ground for ambitious projects.                         

We remain open for developments in other jurisdictions that may prove advantageous for                         

Neufund in the future. ​However, we are already able to do our business globally thanks                             
to our innovative legal structure ​. See details below. 

8.2 Platform Governance & Organisational Structure 
Neufund functions as an ecosystem of off-chain and on-chain organizations with legal                       

and smart contracts that back them. The following are the entities involved in operating                           

it. 

8.2.1 Fifth Force 
Fifth Force is the Platform operator. Its main task is to govern the Platform. 

Fifth Force GmbH is a German company that creates and continuously develops the                         

Platform that hosts the Neufund ecosystem. Fifth Force bears the cost of developing and                           

running the Platform, which includes employee salaries and the cost of legal                       

representation. It is owned by its founders and equity investors that have provided initial                           

funding in a classical way. Fifth Force generates revenue from Neumarks (see ​Neumark                         
Distribution ​). Therefore the success of Fifth Force is fully aligned with the success of the                             
Platform and the interests of all Neumark holders. 

Fifth Force is currently an off-chain company, managed by Neufund founders (see ​Team ​).                         
Management means among others: development of and updates to the code, setting                       

fees, creating legal structure, setting the token model (see ​Neufund Token Economy​),                       
performing basic legal due diligence of companies, etc. 

The off-chain status of Fifth Force will change. One of the first Equity Token Offering                             

events will be the one of Fifth Force. Our final goal is to have equity in Fifth Force fully                                     

tokenized and thus owned by the community. We plan for Fifth Force to be the first                               

20 "Neufund Announces EUREG Report As First Step In Regulatory Initiative." 3 Jul. 2017,                           
https://blog.neufund.org/neufund-announces-eureg-report-as-first-step-in-regulatory-initiative-74ccf4115ee​. 
Accessed 21 Aug. 2017. 

neufund.org September 2017 48 

https://blog.neufund.org/neufund-announces-eureg-report-as-first-step-in-regulatory-initiative-74ccf4115ee
http://neufund.org/


 

real-life example of the concept of a tokenized public company (see ​Platform Operator                         
Redundancy ​). One might also call it a DAO-ification of Fifth Force. Once completed, Fifth                           
Force token holders will be able to govern the company and decide on its future. An                               

even further step forward could be presenting Neufund fully on-chain as a nexus of smart                             

contracts. 

8.2.2 Neumark Holders 
Neumark holders are a community gathered around the Platform with common economic                       

interests. They will include Fifth Force, Investors, and any other entities that decide to                           

acquire Neumarks on a secondary market. 

Neumark holders are entitled to certain proceeds of the Platform (see ​Neumark Token                         
Value ​), which are automatically distributed pro rata. They have no governance powers, at                         
least until the DAO-ification of Fifth Force takes place. 

8.2.3 Company Investors 
Anyone that has acquired Equity Tokens becomes a Company Investor. They have                       

shareholder rights, to be exercised with the use of tools delivered by Neufund. They can                             

have shorter (to sell tokens to other investors) or longer (exit etc.) stakes in the                             

company’s success. They are compensated by valuation increase (secondary sale), or                     

proceeds from an exit, or proceeds pay-outs. 

All Company Investors together form the ​Investment Community​. We aim not to exclude                         
anyone from the Investment Community. Both cryptocurrency (ETH) and traditional                   

currency (EURT) investors are welcome (see ​Fundraising ​). 

8.2.4 Companies 
A Company that seeks investment through the Neufund ecosystem may in principle be                         

established in any jurisdiction. To get such an investment, the Company converts part or                           

all of its equity into Equity Tokens and offers these to investors.  

A Company DO (Distributed Organization) is an on-chain representation of a Company                       

and its community of Company Investors. It provides on-chain functions to raise money,                         

establish shareholder governance, as well as other post-investment operations. The                   

Company DO may also distribute periodical proceeds payouts and proceeds to Company                       

Investors upon a Company’s exit (acquisition or IPO). 

neufund.org September 2017 49 

http://neufund.org/


 

8.2.5 Neumint 
Neumint is an SPV (special purpose vehicle) fully controlled by Fifth Force. Its main task is                               

to allow the performance of investments in fiat currency on the Platform by managing                           

and issuing Euro Tokens (EURT). 

We have decided to establish Neumint due to a lack of market players that offer a                               

reliable stable coin solution. However, Neumint will only operate within the Neufund                       

ecosystem, and using EURT outside the Platform will not be possible. In the future                           

Neumint may be replaced by an external entity that offers a reliable stable token solution. 

8.2.6 Transparent Trustee 
 

We assume that legal systems will           

eventually recognize equity that “lives”         

directly on the blockchain. This         

development is already happening in a few             

progressive jurisdictions in the world, with           

Delaware as the most prominent example .           21

Until a sufficiently solid legal framework is             

developed, we use a legal structure in             

Germany, designed by us specifically for           

that purpose. It involves using a separate             

entity under the full control of the Platform               

operator. This entity, called the Transparent           

Trustee, serves as a legal holder of the               

tokenized equity of companies (and is thus             

included in the Company’s cap table). The             

Transparent Trustee lives on a legal layer of               

the Neufund structure, invisible from the           

point of view of Equity Token holders.             

Off-chain and on-chain solutions are used           

21 "Delaware Blockchain Initiative: Transforming the Foundational ...." 16 Mar. 2017,                     
https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-inf
rastructure-of-corporate-finance/​. Accessed 21 Aug. 2017. 

neufund.org September 2017 50 

https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-infrastructure-of-corporate-finance/
https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-infrastructure-of-corporate-finance/
http://neufund.org/


 

to eliminate theoretical risks from trusted third parties. Transparent Trustee allows the                       

whole Neufund model to be fully effective without awaiting future legislative changes. 

8.3 Regulatory Considerations 
The Neufund ecosystem is established and operated in the jurisdiction of Germany. It                         

fully complies with German and EU regulatory requirements. Below we highlight key                       

regulatory issues and our approach towards them. 

8.3.1 No “Neufund ICO” 
Neufund is not performing a “Neufund ICO”. It is also not performing a “sale” or                             

“crowdfunding”. The aim of the ​Initial Capital Building Mechanism (ICBM) is to deliver                         
liquidity to the Neufund platform in the form of commitments for future investments. 

None of the entities within the Neufund ecosystem will be able to use funds committed                             

by the Investment Community except the contributors themselves. Neufund is not going                       

to use any of these funds, and indeed cannot do so (from a technical perspective). 

ICBM events are governed by a separate document setting forth legal terms and                         

conditions for participation and commitment of funds. It functions as a legally binding                         

document, published by us prior to commencement of the ICBM. 

8.3.2 Neumarks 
Neumarks are fuel for the Neufund Platform and a key element of the ​Neufund token                             
economy ​. 

On the basis of extensive legal analysis of the German law conducted by professional                           

attorneys we conclude that Neumarks are not securities. We are aware that questions                         

regarding the regulatory status of Neumarks in other jurisdictions will emerge. Since we                         

cannot exclude different regulatory treatment of Neumarks in all jurisdictions, participants                     

from unsupported countries are not able to take part in the ICBM event, neither through                             

commitment of cryptocurrency (ETH) nor stable coin (EURT). 

Neumark holders are bound by the Neumark Holder Agreement, which defines basic                       

rights and obligations for them, in line with the contents of this whitepaper. 

neufund.org September 2017 51 

http://neufund.org/


 

8.3.3 Equity Token Offerings of Companies 
On a technological layer, a Company ETO involves Company Investors acquiring Equity                       

Tokens in exchange for funds (ETH or EURT) in a fully digital process. On a legal layer,                                 

the ​Transparent Trustee acquires shares in the Company and is able to perform all                           
actions of a shareholder, as instructed by Company Token Holders. Company ETOs are                         

governed by German law. 

From the perspective of Company Investors, the investment process is fully digital (with                         

entering into a smart contract as a main step). On a legal layer, the Transparent Trustee                               

enters into a legal agreement with the Company. 

8.3.4 Equity Tokens 
Equity Tokens are distributed to Company Investors upon their investment in a Company.                         

Our aim is to make Equity Token holders able to exercise all crucial shareholder rights.                             

Neufund also provides infrastructure and tools to make that possible in practice. The                         

interests of Equity Token holders are ensured and protected with use of traditional                         

off-chain (e.g. legal agreements) and innovative on-chain (smart contracts) solutions. 

Equity Tokens are deemed securities under German law and numerous other                     

jurisdictions. Securities law, KYC, and anti-money-laundering regulation is fully observed.                   

For example, we require KYC before any investments in a Company or acquisitions of                           

Equity Tokens take place. 

 

   

neufund.org September 2017 52 

http://neufund.org/


 

9 Roadmap 
There are two parallel paths to the Neufund story. The first one is about the product:                               

building the product with all necessary features, bringing capital to the platform,                       

procuring relevant deals, producing a sound token economy, and so on. The second one                           

is about governance: performing a gradual legal and organizational transformation to                     

make the Platform Operator redundant in the sense of transforming all legal entities into                           

decentralized organizations (“tokenized public companies”, as we call them). We are                     

working towards a future where Neufund is fully owned and managed by community                         

members. 

9.1 Build Primary Market for Equity Token 
Neumark Ether ICBM starts: Autumn 2017 

Building the capital pool of the Neufund platform starts with the Ether phase of the Initial                               

Capital Building Mechanism (ICBM). For 30 days, or until the cap is reached, investors will                             

be able to commit their money and receive their Neumark reward (see ​Chapter 6 ​). 

Ether ICBM ends and Neumark trading is enabled: Autumn 2017 

The Neumark is an ERC20 token. The transfer function is enabled right after the Ether                             

phase of the ICBM ends, with the intention to enable trade on major exchanges. 

Launch of platform fundamentals, (Neumark) EURT ICBM starts: Winter 2017 

Fundamental features of the Neufund Platform (e.g. registration and login flows with                       

hardware Neukey support​, KYC processes for individuals and organizations) launch. The                     
stable EURT token and associated ​Neumint entity are launched and provide a way to                           
commit funds in the ICBM and/or ETOs via fiat currency. 

Existing Neumark token holders may proceed with migration to the platform and perform                         

KYC for their accounts. 

At the same time the capital buildup of the platform continues. All investors may                           

participate in the ​EURT phase of ICBM​, where they may commit Euro in form of EURT and                                 
be rewarded with Neumark that is immediately tradable. 

neufund.org September 2017 53 

http://neufund.org/


 

Launch of primary market platform, first Offerings of Equity Tokens: Winter 2017/2018 

Companies start listing their offers, talk and negotiate terms with investors, proceed with                         

ETOs and get funded. 

Neufund also reveals a first batch of pre-selected high quality deals prepared in advance. 

First Equity Token Offerings completed: Winter 2017/Spring 2018 

First token offerings are completed: fees are distributed for the first time, Neumarks are                           

“mined” for the first time outside of ICBM, and ETO investors become shareholders of the                             

companies they invested in, which gives them access to ​on-chain company governance​. 

Support for Protocol Tokens: Early 2018 

Conditional on market demand, Neufund will launch support for any ​protocol token ​,                       
allowing for token offerings like that of Filecoin with the backing of SAFT agreements.                           22 23

Such support becomes possible thanks to the ​extensible ​ Investment Protocol. 

Product Milestones: Years 2018 and 2019 

Following the launch of an initial version, the Neufund Platform expands with additional                         

features serving both the investors and companies, e.g.  

● Follow the Investor​. Allows investors to ​co-invest with other investors                   
automatically​. 

● Investment Protocol: Alternative pricing mechanisms​. ICOs employ various               
mechanisms to set the price of a token being sold. Neufund’s goal is to open the                               

investment protocol and ​let developers add custom pricing mechanisms ​o ​n ​t​h​e​i ​r                     
o ​w ​n. 

● Investment protocol: Bring your own fund​. Allows for any kind of fund                       
governance on top of the Platform’s investment protocol, including various forms                     

of tokenized funds. Protocols for fund building, such as ​Melonport funds or                       
Augur’s prediction markets ​, may be used to make investment decisions. 

● Investment protocol: Bring your own company governance​. The Platform opens                   
its investment protocol to let users build any company governance and add-ons,                       

22 https://coinlist.co/currencies/filecoin/overview 
23 
https://coinlist.co/static/media/Protocol%20Labs%20-%20SAFT%20for%20Filecoin%20Token%20Presale.7
d759ef3.pdf 

neufund.org September 2017 54 

https://github.com/melonproject/protocol
https://augur.net/
http://neufund.org/


 

so long as they conform to basic requirements for equity tokens. For example,                         

Aragon organizations ​m ​i​g ​h ​t ​b​e ​a ​b​l​e to perform token offerings on the Neufund                       
platform. 

● Tokenized Funds ​. Support for tokenized funds, where token holders are Limited                     
Partners. Neufund does not plan to be directly involved in implementing                     

governance or the legal side of tokenized funds, but plans to expand its                         

investment protocol to enable token offerings of such funds. 

9.2 Fifth Force (Platform Operator) Redundancy 
Fifth Force is the Platform Operator. Its operations are financed via ​Neumark reward and                           
collecting of platform fees ​, ​w ​h ​i​c​h aligns Fifth Force interests with other Neumark holders’                         
interests. Fifth Force is an off-chain limited liability company – a German GmbH                         

incorporated in Berlin – currently controlled by its shareholders. It was founded as a                           

mechanism to build the Neufund fundraising ecosystem, however with the goal to                       

ultimately “tokenize the enterprise”. The plan is to melt all parts of the company into the                               

community by distributing its ownership, and eventually becoming a DAO.  

It is a widespread belief that some form of ​tokenized public company will soon become                             
legal reality. Initiatives like the Delaware Blockchain Initiative ​s​e​e​m ​t​o ​b​e ​t ​h ​e ​f​i​r​s​t ​s​t ​e​p ​i​n                             24

t ​h ​e ​ ​d ​e ​v ​e ​l​o ​p ​m ​e ​n ​t ​ of l​e ​g​a​l​ ​s​y​s​t​e​m ​s​ ​i​n​ ​this ​d​i​r​e​c​t​i​o​n ​. 

A tokenized Fifth Force would still remain the Platform’s operators, yet with a different                           

governance model. The current default company governance (straightforward ​direct                 
democracy ​) would be replaced with structures more typical for tokenized companies,                     
like ​liquid democracy​ and elected delegates.  

In the first step, Fifth Force would tokenize partially. Members of the community would                           

be invited to govern the company together with its existing shareholders and investors.  

Neufund’s ultimate goal is for Fifth Force to be managed and controlled by the                           

community with the majority of votes. At this point the Neufund Platform may elect its                             

operational management, which would be responsible for the company’s executive                   

trajectory.  

24 "Delaware Blockchain Initiative: Transforming the Foundational ...." 16 Mar. 2017,                     
https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-inf
rastructure-of-corporate-finance/​. Accessed 1 Sep. 2017. 

neufund.org September 2017 55 

https://aragon.one/
https://aragon.one/
https://aragon.one/
https://aragon.one/
https://aragon.one/
https://aragon.one/
https://aragon.one/
https://aragon.one/
https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-infrastructure-of-corporate-finance/
https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-infrastructure-of-corporate-finance/
https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-infrastructure-of-corporate-finance/
https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-infrastructure-of-corporate-finance/
https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-infrastructure-of-corporate-finance/
https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-infrastructure-of-corporate-finance/
https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-infrastructure-of-corporate-finance/
https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-infrastructure-of-corporate-finance/
https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-infrastructure-of-corporate-finance/
https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-infrastructure-of-corporate-finance/
https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-infrastructure-of-corporate-finance/
https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-infrastructure-of-corporate-finance/
https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-infrastructure-of-corporate-finance/
https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-infrastructure-of-corporate-finance/
https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-infrastructure-of-corporate-finance/
https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-infrastructure-of-corporate-finance/
https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-infrastructure-of-corporate-finance/
https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-infrastructure-of-corporate-finance/
https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-infrastructure-of-corporate-finance/
https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-infrastructure-of-corporate-finance/
https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-infrastructure-of-corporate-finance/
https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-infrastructure-of-corporate-finance/
https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-infrastructure-of-corporate-finance/
https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-infrastructure-of-corporate-finance/
https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-infrastructure-of-corporate-finance/
https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-infrastructure-of-corporate-finance/
https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-infrastructure-of-corporate-finance/
https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-infrastructure-of-corporate-finance/
https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-infrastructure-of-corporate-finance/
https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-infrastructure-of-corporate-finance/
https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-infrastructure-of-corporate-finance/
https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-infrastructure-of-corporate-finance/
https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-infrastructure-of-corporate-finance/
https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-infrastructure-of-corporate-finance/
https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-infrastructure-of-corporate-finance/
https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-infrastructure-of-corporate-finance/
https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-infrastructure-of-corporate-finance/
https://corpgov.law.harvard.edu/2017/03/16/delaware-blockchain-initiative-transforming-the-foundational-infrastructure-of-corporate-finance/
http://neufund.org/


 

10 Reporting & Communication 
Investors will commit funds on the commitment page: ​https://commit.neufund.org ​. 

We welcome your questions, concerns, and comments to this whitepaper specifically,                     

and regarding Neufund in general. Please track our progress or get in touch using the                             

following channels: 

● Neufund Slack channel: ​https://neufund/slack 
● Neufund Subreddit: ​https://www.reddit.com/r/neufund/  
● Neufund Blog: ​https://blog.neufund.org    
● Neufund Facebook page: ​https://www.facebook.com/neufundorg  
● Neufund Twitter account: ​https://twitter.com/neufundorg  

   

neufund.org September 2017 56 

https://commit.neufund.org/
https://neufund/slack
https://www.reddit.com/r/neufund/
https://blog.neufund.org/
https://www.facebook.com/neufundorg
https://twitter.com/neufundorg
http://neufund.org/


 

11 Team & Advisors 
Meet our founders Zoe Adamovicz, CEO, Marcin Rudolf, CTO and André Eggert, Legal                         

Architect of Neufund, as well as Remco Bloemen, Blockchain Architect. 

11.1 Team 
 

 

Zoe Adamovicz 
CEO & Co-Founder at Neufund 

Zoe Adamovicz is an entrepreneur and occasional angel               

investor. 
Zoe is passionate about building technology businesses that are                 

impactful, positive and at the same time profitable and powerful.                   

Prior to Neufund, she founded Xyo, a company that re-imagines                   

how people discover apps, Priori Data (app store intelligence),                 

and Concise Software which provides software development             

and engineering services. 
She is also a mentor to the Gaza Sky Geeks, where she supports                         

technology entrepreneurship in the challenging area of the Gaza                 

Strip and helps introduce Blockchain. Zoe is an expert in                   

technology entrepreneurship and venture capital. 

 

Marcin Rudolf 

CTO & Co-Founder at Neufund 

Marcin currently leads the technology development at Neufund.               

He has been tracking the development of blockchain technology                 

for the past 6 years. 

Before joining Neufund, he led the technology development at                 

the app search engine Xyo.  

He has been a developer and team leader in projects involving                     

messaging and telecommunication (Orange), cryptography and           

mobile devices (Jamba Music), as well as insurance and                 

government (Fiat, Hewlett-Packard).  

neufund.org September 2017 57 

http://neufund.org/


 

 

André Eggert 
Legal Architect & Shareholder at Neufund 

André Eggert is a partner at LACORE. He advises companies                   

and entrepreneurs as well as investors. One of his core activities                     

is the support of M&A and financing transactions. André has                   

special knowledge in the areas of private equity financing and                   

quasi-equity instruments. His focus is, moreover, on negotiating               

and drafting joint venture and cooperation agreements. He               

possesses relevant experience resulting from his involvement in               

a wide range of international transactions with parties from the                   

Anglo-American legal system. Additionally, he possesses           

specific expertise in the technology and entertainment             

industries. 

 

You can see the rest of our team ​here​. 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

neufund.org September 2017 58 

https://neufund.org/community
http://neufund.org/


 

11.2 Advisors 
 

 

Fabian Vogelsteller 

Ethereum and Mist Developer 
Fabian Vogelsteller became interested in web technologies at               
the age of 14. He developed a skill set from graphic design to                         
coding PHP to Python, ActionScript, Objective C, HTML, CSS                 
and fell in love with JavaScript. He worked as a freelance web                       
developer for over 12 years and is the creator of the open                       
source feindura – Flat File CMS. Fabian is a strong advocate of                       
open-source software and has built and contributed to a lot of                     
open-source libraries and projects and wrote a book on                 
Meteor.js a open source JavaScript Framework. His interest in                 
cryptocurrencies like Bitcoin led him to be part of one of the                       
most ambitious blockchain projects to date, the Ethereum               
project. For almost two years he has worked as the lead Dapp                       
developer for the Ethereum project, building the low-level               
JavaScript API, DApps and Ethereum’s Wallet and the Mist                 
browser. 

 

Michael Jackson 

Partner at Mangrove Capital & Board Director at 

Blockchain.com 

Michael Jackson is a Board Director at Blockchain.com and                 
Partner at Mangrove Capital Partners. He started his career at                   
Monsanto and went on to manage the Supply Chain and                   
Logistics business consulting practice at Arthur Andersen and               
then at Ernst & Young. In 2006, he pioneered early-stage                   
investment from Western VCs in Russia. His sectors of interests                   
revolve around consumer Internet and e-commerce across             
Europe, scouting for startups that involve essential shift or                 
disruption in technology, business model or consumer behavior.               
Open-minded and curious by nature, he enjoys travelling and                 
discovering different cultures, which makes him keen on               
developing business connections in new and sometimes             
untapped geographies. He currently serves on the boards of                 
Lesara, KupiVIP, RedPoints, Synerscope, Enigma, and the             
Mangrove Foundation. Michael holds a Bachelor’s Degree in               
Nautical Sciences from the Antwerp Maritime Academy and a                 
Master in International Business and Management with high               
honors from the Brussels Management School. A Belgian               
national, he speaks French, English, Dutch and German. 

neufund.org September 2017 59 

http://neufund.org/


 

 

Julian Zawistowski 

CEO and Founder at Golem 

Julian is an economist by trade, fascinated with blockchain                 
technology, as well as sociology and the economics of                 
decentralised systems. In the past, Julian served as a consultant                   
and researcher of public policies with a background in public                   
economics, the framing of which he finds very useful for                   
understanding decentralised systems. 

 

Adam Stradling 

Crypto Investor and Entrepreneur & Former Co-founder of 

Bitcoin.com in 2011/12 

Adam is a financial technology entrepreneur who pioneered the                 
development of Bitcoin and related blockchain technologies. 
During 2011 and 2012, he cofounded and operated               
Bitcoin.com/Tradehill wherein they sold/traded 1 million plus             
bitcoins (now worth billions of USD). Since then he has been an                       
advisor, investor, and consultant for many Bitcoin and               
blockchain companies and systems like Ethereum, Factom,             
Siacoin, Bitnexo, and others. Over the years his works have                   
been chronicled in CNN, Fox News, and hundreds of other                   
media outlets. 
Before Adam became an entrepreneur he worked in the                 
banking and financial services industry as a             
consultant/researcher covering financial technology and risk           
management. Notably, he worked with the financial risk               
consulting group at Ernst and Young (EY) and also sold the                     
investment research and technology services of Evalueserve             
(quant focus). He was the Co-founder and Steering Committee                 
member of Chile’s national PRMIA chapter and has been a                   
content contributor to GARP (Global Association of Risk               
Professionals). 
Adam received his Bachelor of Science in Materials Engineering                 
from Rensselaer Polytechnic Institute in Troy, NY. 

neufund.org September 2017 60 

http://neufund.org/


 

 

Max Kordek 

President of Lisk Foundation 
Max Kordek is a co-founder of Lisk and the President of the Lisk                         
Foundation. As a futurist and thoroughbred entrepreneur             
interested in disruptive technologies, he co-founded the             
platform after seeing the potential of blockchain-based             
applications. It caused a stir in early 2016 when it collected                     
14000 BTC in its crowd fund. Max is also the Director of the                         
Lightcurve GmbH, a rapidly expanding blockchain consultancy.             
Max immersed himself in the global startup community from a                   
young age, beginning at just 14. Over the past several years,                     
Max has become an active participant and industry leader in the                     
blockchain and cryptocurrency industry, gaining invaluable           
knowledge of Bitcoin and Altcoins. 

 

Christophe Maire 

CEO and Founder at Atlantic Labs 
Christophe has more than 18 years of experience as a founder                     
and CEO of technology ventures. He founded gate5 which he                   
sold to Nokia in 2006. Christophe since co-founded a number                   
of companies with global reach, such as Plazes.com (Nokia),                 
txtr.com or recently Medigo.com, Mimi.io, and Blloon.com. As an                 
angel investor, Christophe was involved in Brands4Friends             
(eBay), StudiVZ (HB), Plista (groupM), Readmill (Dropbox),             
amongst others. (Christophe was named best “European Seed               
investor” in both 2011 and 2012 by Techcrunch. He serves on                     
the board of EyeEm, Klara and Soundcloud. 

 

Paweł Bylica 

Ethereum Core Developer 

Experienced C++ and Python software engineer. Ethereum core               
developer. Also involved in Golem Network Project as               
Ethereum specialist. 

neufund.org September 2017 61 

http://neufund.org/


 

 

Alexander Lange 

VC at Earlybird & Board Member at Shapeshift 
Alex is a passionate Venture Investor and crypto enthusiast                 
since early 2016. 2012 he graduated in German Law (with                   
honors) and economics. After a very short career in law at                     
Latham & Watkins and Schindhelm he joined Google/DailyDeal               
and fintech software company pepperbill in Business             
Development roles for 3 years. As a side role he advised young                       
startups as a data protection commissioner what led to his initial                     
interest in Bitcoin and the crypto economy. In 2015 he became                     
an early stage VC at Heilemann Ventures which merged with                   
Earlybird in January 2016. Ever since he backed 7 companies in                     
multiple rounds and serves on the boards of Crossengage and                   
Shapeshift. He contributes to the ecosystem by hosting               
blockchain related events, public speaking and regular             
publications. 

 

Minh Ha Duong 
Investment Manager at Project A Ventures 
Ha is a technology enthusiast and an Investment Manager at                   
Project A Ventures. Having studied Industrial Engineering and               
Management, he has been exploring the intersection of               
technological innovations and business implications for the last               
years. Through roles in marketing, business development, and               
strategy in companies like Google, Techstars, and several               
startups, he learned what makes digital business models               
successful and is now applying this knowledge in the venture                   
capital industry. At Project A, Ha covers startups in many                   
technical areas including machine learning, blockchain, and             
developer tools. He is known for open-sourcing his research                 
and data on >600 European AI Startups and for being more and                       
more fascinated by the crypto economy and its societal                 
implications. As a believer in communities, he acts as a mentor                     
at Techstars, and occasionally supports startups in an advisory                 
capacity. 

 

neufund.org September 2017 62 

http://neufund.org/

